Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 6 Public Assistance Act

40-6-1.
Short title — “Public assistance” and “department” defined.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Public Assistance Act.”

Definitions. As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the meanings set forth herein, unless the context in which the terms are used clearly indicates to the contrary:

“Department” shall mean the Rhode Island department of human services.

“Public assistance” means general public assistance (GPA); supplemental security income (SSI); RI works pursuant to chapter 5.2 of this title; childcare assistance; medical assistance, and supplemental nutritional assistance program (SNAP) pursuant to 7 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq.; which programs are administered and/or financed in whole or in part by the Rhode Island department of human services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 11; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 11; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 11; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 11; P.L. 2011, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 407, § 1.

40-6-2.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to provide public assistance to residents of the state who are in need and who meet the eligibility requirements of the various programs that constitute public assistance. It shall be the responsibility of the department to provide assistance to residents of Rhode Island found by the department to be eligible for assistance in accordance with this chapter and the rules and regulations lawfully promulgated by the department. In that the state has resources to meet the needs of its residents, the department shall determine, upon application, eligibility for those programs financed in whole or in part by the federal government before providing general public assistance as provided in §

40-6-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2.

40-6-3.
General public assistance.

It is the purpose of this section to provide general public assistance to any person who is a resident of the state and who is eligible, in accordance with the rules and regulations of the department, and is in need; provided, further, that benefits under this program shall be provided only to residents who are citizens of the United States or aliens lawfully admitted for permanent residence or otherwise permanently residing in the United States under color of law, and benefits shall not be provided to illegal or undocumented aliens. In that there are limited resources available to meet the needs of the residents of this state and recognizing that needs of certain children and families have been provided by this state pursuant to chapter 5.1 of this title, it is the intent of this chapter that general public assistance shall not be provided to any individual who is eligible or who would, but for income and resources, be eligible for cash assistance pursuant to chapter 5.1 of this title and the rules and regulations of the department. General public assistance shall not be available to any individual who has been found eligible for supplemental security income (SSI) as provided in §

40-6-27

, and the general public medical assistance, as provided for in this chapter, shall not be available to any individual who has been found eligible for medical assistance as provided pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., as both of these programs are financed in part by the limited resources of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 46, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 11; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 11; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 11; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 11.

40-6-3.1.
Eligibility for general public assistance.

The state, acting by and through the department, shall provide assistance (in the form specified in §

40-6-3.2

) to residents of the state found by the department, in accordance with this chapter and rules and regulations of the department, to be eligible for general public assistance; provided further, that benefits under this program shall be provided only to residents who are citizens of the United States or aliens lawfully admitted for permanent residence or otherwise permanently residing in the United States under color of law, and benefits shall not be provided to illegal or undocumented aliens.

Individuals eligible for GPA.

General public assistance shall be provided to the following individuals and families provided all other eligibility requirements of this chapter are met: Individuals age eighteen (18) or older, provided that they do not have a dependent child who is living in his or her home, and provided that they are determined by the department, in accordance with this chapter and departmental regulations, to be suffering from an illness, injury, or medical condition as determined by physical examination by a licensed physician, that is reasonably expected to last for a period of at least thirty (30) days from the date the application for general public assistance is filed with the department and that precludes the individual from working. The illness, injury, or medical condition may be based on a primary diagnosis of alcoholism or substance abuse. The total physical or mental incapacity shall be verified by a medical practitioner and/or a qualified substance abuse counselor designated by the department, within forty-five (45) days of the date the individual is found by the department to be totally incapacitated. If total physical or mental incapacity cannot be reasonably verified, then the individual shall not be eligible for general public assistance under this subsection.

The department shall provide an application for medical assistance (Medicaid) benefits to each applicant for general public assistance and shall use a uniform medical form for both programs to secure information from the applicant’s treating physician. A decision on the application for general public assistance shall be made within thirty (30) days of receipt of a completed application.

Individuals found eligible on the basis of illness, injury, or medical condition under subsection (b) shall be eligible for assistance only in the forms specified in §

40-6-3.2(a)(2)

and (a)(3), and only for an initial period of up to six (6) months, renewable for a period of up to an additional six (6) months. In order to receive assistance for a period greater than twelve (12) months, individuals must reapply for general public assistance.

Resources. Ownership of real or personal property shall disqualify individuals from receiving general public assistance; provided, however, that the following property or resources owned by the individuals shall be exempted:

A home occupied by the individuals;

One motor vehicle having an equity value not exceeding four thousand six hundred fifty dollars ($4,650) or a vehicle necessary to transport a family member with a disability, where the vehicle is specially equipped to meet the specific needs of the person with a disability or if the vehicle is a special type of vehicle that makes it possible to transport the person with the disability;

Cash or liquid assets not exceeding four hundred dollars ($400);

Such tools of the trade not to exceed an aggregate value of one thousand dollars ($1,000) and household furnishings and effects as the director shall determine by regulation.

Income. (1)(i) Income shall not disqualify an individual from receiving general public assistance provided that the income, as defined and determined by the department, is within the income limitations established by the regulations of the department.

(ii)

Pursuant to the purposes set forth in §

40-6-3

and notwithstanding the provisions of §

40-6-3

.3 [Repealed], individuals found ineligible for cash assistance under chapter 5.1 of this title due to provisions of the chapter regarding alien sponsors, the deeming of alien sponsor income or the deeming of stepparent income, shall not be eligible for general public assistance.

(2)

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

40-6-3.3

[Repealed], the receipt of lump-sum income shall disqualify an individual from receiving general public assistance.

(3)

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations regarding the treatment of lump-sum income.

Postsecondary education. (1) An individual age eighteen (18) or older, attending a school, college, or university as a full-time student or attending a full-time program of vocational or technical training, all beyond the level of secondary education, shall not be eligible for general public assistance under this chapter, excepting, however, those individuals active as students with the department’s vocational rehabilitation programs who have been certified as unemployable by the department.

(2)

Notwithstanding the foregoing prohibition, an individual, age eighteen (18) or older, pursuing a course of study on a part-time basis beyond the level of secondary education, may be eligible for general public assistance, provided the student remains available for and is actively seeking employment, and provided that the individual meets all other eligibility requirements for general public assistance pursuant to this chapter.

Cooperation in applying for SSI and medical assistance. All applicants and recipients of general public assistance shall, within thirty (30) days of application for general public assistance or notice from the department, be required to apply for and cooperate in the determination for benefits under the federal Supplemental Security Income (SSI) program and/or medical assistance, as provided pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., provided the applicant or recipient is determined by the department to be potentially eligible for benefits.

Report of income or resources by recipients. If, at any time during the receipt of general public assistance, the recipient thereof becomes possessed of income or resources in excess of the amount previously reported by him or her, it shall be his or her duty and a condition of eligibility to notify the department of this fact immediately on the receipt or possession of additional income or resources.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 23, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 46, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 25, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 11; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 11; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 11; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 11; P.L. 1998, ch. 72, § 1.

40-6-3.2.
Form of assistance.

General public assistance shall be provided in the form of:

Financial assistance payable by check;

Beginning on July 1, 1992, each hospital licensed under chapter 17 of title 23, other than state-operated hospitals, shall provide free services and charity care for reasonable and necessary inpatient and outpatient hospital services as the department by regulation requires to serve all persons seeking services from the hospital who are determined to be eligible for general public assistance. The latter shall be treated as free service and charitable care. Each hospital shall, in addition, continue to provide free services and charitable care to other persons in accordance with each hospital’s charter and mission statement and with §§

23-17-19.1(13)

and

23-17-26

. Eligibility for general public assistance shall be determined by the department of human services. Each hospital required under this section to provide services to individuals eligible for general public assistance shall, upon request of the auditor general of the state, provide the auditor general with information as he or she shall request regarding the services provided. The auditor general shall make annual reports to the finance committees of the Rhode Island house and senate on general public assistance hospital care. The obligations of hospitals under this section shall terminate when vendor payments for hospitals have been restored;

Vendor payment of medical assistance as the department by regulation determines for only the following reasonable and necessary medical services: Outpatient physician services and a limited formulary of prescription drugs to be established by the department, when the services and drugs are provided in, or approved by, an authorized health center, or by such other providers and at such locations as may, from time to time, be designated by the department. No payment shall be made for medical expenses incurred prior to the date the individual makes written application for assistance.

The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to detect and prevent program abuse by recipients and providers of assistance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 6, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 23, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 46, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 25, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 18, § 1.

40-6-3.3.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 46, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 18, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 23, P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 23, P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 23 and P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 23, effective on the later of May 1, 1997 or the first day of the second month following the month of receipt by the Rhode Island Department of Human Services of all federal approvals and/or federal waivers from the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services necessary to implement the provisions of the acts, provided, however, that the Rhode Island Department of Human Services is authorized and directed to seek such federal approvals and/or federal waivers upon passage of the acts.

40-6-3.4 — 40-6-3.6.
[Repealed.]

40-6-3.7.
Local welfare offices.

There shall be in each city or town a public welfare office or offices where persons may make application for any type of public assistance, unless the director of the department of human services designates other suitable offices within the state where persons may make application. Suitable quarters for the office shall be provided by cities and towns, and for the expense of maintaining the offices, the cities and towns shall be reimbursed as a general public assistance expense. In situations where, in the judgment of a city or town, the amount of work does not justify the establishment of a local office or where, for other reasons, a city or town does not desire a local office, the state may, with the approval of the cities or towns concerned, establish an office that may serve two (2) or more cities or towns.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 6, art. 11, § 3.

40-6-3.8.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 46, § 2, effective July 1, 1992.

40-6-3.9.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 46, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 25, § 2, effective July 1, 1993.

40-6-3.10.
Funeral and burial expenses.

The department may provide for vendor payment of reasonable funeral and burial expenses of deceased residents of this state who are found eligible in accordance with rules and regulations of the department. The department shall, from time to time, establish cost standards for the reasonable funeral and burial expenses, which cost standards shall establish the maximum amount payable by this department for the expenses and the maximum, total allowable funeral and burial costs. The amount payable under this section shall be determined with due regard to the income and resources of the deceased and his or her legally-liable relatives, if any, and shall be reduced dollar-for-dollar by contributions of friends or other kindred in excess of the maximum total allowable funeral and burial costs established by the department.

Application for payment of funeral and burial expenses shall be made on behalf of a decedent before final funeral arrangements with a funeral director are concluded. Provided, that any legally liable relative and/or agent of the decedent may make an application under this section within thirty (30) days after the death of the decedent.

In determining either eligibility for benefits and/or the amount of any reduction in benefits paid under this section, the department shall exclude any of the following forms of income:

Veterans’ benefits; and/or

Social Security lump-sum benefits.

The department’s standard, basic-allowance payment shall be set at nine hundred dollars ($900).

The amount of the contribution that friends or other kindred, except for legally-liable relatives, may make for upgraded services and merchandise, without affecting eligibility for the basic allowance, shall be set at one thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600).

Whenever the person having custody of an unclaimed deceased body as specified in §

23-18.1-1

contacts the department of human services to report the unclaimed body of a deceased person, the department shall deem this referral as an application of payment for funeral and burial expenses, and the department shall process that application in accordance with the provisions of this section.

In the event that the department determines that the unclaimed deceased body is not eligible for a vendor payment of reasonable funeral and burial expenses because of the availability of the decedent’s assets, the director of the department may nonetheless authorize the burial of the person and he or she may notify the specified funeral home of the existence of the decedent’s assets.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 365, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 470, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 201, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 350, § 2.

40-6-3.11.
“Dependent child” defined.

For purposes of this chapter, the term “dependent child” shall mean a dependent child as defined by Title IV-A of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq., as amended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2.

40-6-3.12.
Enteral nutrition products.

As used in this section:

“Enteral nutrition” means a supplemental feeding that is provided via the gastrointestinal tract by mouth (orally), or through a tube, catheter, or stoma that delivers nutrients distal to the oral cavity.

“Nutritional risk” means actual or potential for developing malnutrition, as evidenced by clinical indicators, the presence of chronic disease, or increased metabolic requirements due to impaired ability to ingest or absorb food adequately.

The department shall provide for vendor payment of enteral nutrition products, in accordance with rules and regulations of the department, when determined to be medically necessary on an individual, case-by-case basis and ordered by a physician in accordance with Rhode Island department of health form(s) on enteral nutrition products.

Protocols for the use of enteral nutrition as a medically necessary treatment for malabsorption caused by Crohn’s disease, ulcerative colitis, gastroesophageal reflux, chronic intestinal pseudo-obstruction, and inherited diseases of amino acids and organic acids may be developed by the director. The determination of medical necessity for enteral nutrition products shall be based upon a combination of clinical data and the presence of indicators that would affect the relative risks and benefits of the products including, but not limited to:

Enteral nutrition, whether orally or by tube feeding, is used as a therapeutic regimen to prevent serious disability or death in a person with a medically diagnosed condition that precludes the full use of regular food.

The person presents clinical signs and symptoms of impaired digestion malabsorption, or nutritional risk, as indicated by the following anthropometric measures:

Weight loss that presents actual or potential for developing malnutrition, as follows:

In adults, showing involuntary or acute weight loss of greater than, or equal to, ten percent (10%) of usual body weight during a three-(3) to six-month (6) period, or body mass index (bmi) below 18.5 kg/m2;

In neonates, infants, and children, showing:

Very low birth weight (lbw), even in the absence of gastrointestinal, pulmonary, or cardiac disorders;

A lack of weight gain, or weight gain less than two (2) standard deviations below the age-appropriate mean in a one-month period for children under six (6) months, or two-month (2) period for children aged six (6) to twelve (12) months;

No weight gain or abnormally slow rate of gain for three (3) months for children older than one year, or documented weight loss that does not reverse promptly with instruction in appropriate diet for age; or

Weight for height less than the tenth (10th) percentile; and

Abnormal laboratory test pertinent to the diagnosis.

The risk factors for actual or potential malnutrition have been identified and documented. Risk factors include, but are not limited to, the following:

Anatomic structures of the gastrointestinal tract that impair digestion and absorption;

Neurological disorders that impair swallowing or chewing;

Diagnosis of inborn errors of metabolism that require medically necessary formula used for specific metabolic conditions and food products modified low in protein (for example, phenylketonuria (pku) tyrosinemia, homocystinuria, maple syrup urine disease, propionic aciduria and methylmalonic aciduria);

Prolonged nutrient losses due to malabsorption syndromes or short-bowel syndromes, diabetes, celiac disease, chronic pancreatitis, renal dialysis, draining abscess, or wounds, etc.;

Treatment with anti-nutrient or catabolic properties (for example, anti-tumor treatments, corticosteroids, immunosuppressant, etc.);

Increased metabolic and/or caloric needs due to excessive burns, infection, trauma, prolonged fever, hyperthyroidism, or illnesses that impair caloric intake and/or retention; or

A failure-to-thrive diagnosis that increases caloric needs while impairing caloric intake and/or retention.

A comprehensive medical history and a physical examination have been conducted to detect factors contributing to nutritional risk.

Enteral nutrition is indicated as the primary source of nutritional support essential for the management of risk factors that impair digestion or malabsorption, and for the management of surgical preparation or postoperative care.

A written plan of care has been developed for regular monitoring of signs and symptoms to detect improvement in the person’s condition. Nutritional status should be monitored regularly:

For improvements in anthropometric measures;

For improvements in laboratory test indicators; and

In children, to assess growth and weight for height.

Enteral nutrition products shall not be considered medically necessary under certain circumstances including, but not limited to, the following:

A medical history and physical examination have been performed and other possible alternatives have been identified to minimize nutritional risk.

The person is underweight, but has the ability to meet nutritional needs through the use of regular food consumption.

Enteral products are used as supplements to a normal or regular diet in a person showing no clinical indicators of nutritional risk.

The person has food allergies, lactose intolerance, or dental problems, but has the ability to meet his or her nutritional requirements through an alternative food source.

Enteral products are to be used for dieting or a weight-loss program.

No medical history or physical examination has been taken and there is no documentation that supports the need for enteral nutrition products.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 253, § 5; P.L. 2014, ch. 269, § 5; P.L. 2014, ch. 519, § 5.

40-6-4.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 47, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 25, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 12, P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 12, P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 12, and P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 12, effective on the later of May 1, 1997 or the first day of the second month following the month of receipt by the Rhode Island Department of Human Services of all federal approvals and/or federal waivers from the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services necessary to implement the provisions of the acts, provided, however, that the Rhode Island Department of Human Services is authorized and directed to seek such federal approvals and/or federal waivers upon passage of the acts.

40-6-4.1.
Ineligibility for aid or assistance — Commitment to training school or adult correctional institutions.

In the event that any child is committed to the training school or adult correctional institutions, and the child’s parent(s) or qualifying relative are receiving or are eligible for aid to families with dependent children (AFDC) as provided pursuant to §

40-6-4

[repealed], Title IV-A of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq., and the rules and regulations of the department, the eligibility of the parent(s) or qualifying relative for AFDC benefits for the child who is placed in the training school shall be suspended during the time the child is committed. The department of children, youth and families or department of corrections shall provide a list or computer compilation to the department of human services, on a monthly basis, that shall identify the name, and if available, the date of birth and social security number of each child committed to the training school or adult correctional institutions, and the name of the parent(s) or qualifying relative, of each child committed to the training school or adult correctional institutions. Notwithstanding the provisions of §

42-72-8

, all information provided by this section shall remain confidential and shall be used only for the purposes of this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to suspend the eligibility of the parent(s) or qualifying relative for AFDC benefits for any children not committed to the training school or adult correctional institutions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 269, § 1.

40-6-5.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 48, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 99, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 12, P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 12, P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 12, and P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 12, effective on the later of May 1, 1997 or the first day of the second month following the month of receipt by the Rhode Island Department of Human Services of all federal approvals and/or federal waivers from the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services necessary to implement the provisions of the acts, provided, however, that the Rhode Island Department of Human Services is authorized and directed to seek such federal approvals and/or federal waivers upon passage of the acts.

40-6-5.1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 26, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 12, P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 12, P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 12, and P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 12, effective on the later of May 1, 1997 or the first day of the second month following the month of receipt by the Rhode Island Department of Human Services of all federal approvals and/or federal waivers from the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services necessary to implement the provisions of the acts, provided, however, that the Rhode Island Department of Human Services is authorized and directed to seek such federal approvals and/or federal waivers upon passage of the acts.

40-6-5.2.
Cashing of AFDC, GPA checks.

For the purposes of this section, the term “banking institution” shall mean: (1) Any state or federally chartered bank, savings bank, loan and investment bank, or credit union located within this state; and (2) Any currency-exchange specialist located within this state and enrolled with the department of human services pursuant to regulations to be adopted by the department.

Each banking institution shall cash, at its main office or any of its branch offices within the state, any check drawn by the state and payable within the state to a recipient of aid to families with dependent children (AFDC) or general public assistance (GPA), if the check is negotiated to the banking institution by the original payee of the check, and if the payee produces reasonable identification required by this section and as provided for in regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (d) hereof.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as limiting any rights the banking institution may have against the payee by contract or at law, with regard to items that are negotiated to it as provided for in this section, that are not paid upon presentment, or where the payee breaches a warranty made under §

6A-3-417

. This section shall not apply to any check negotiated to a banking institution if the institution has reason to believe that the check will not be paid on presentment or that the tendering party may be in breach of one or more of the warranties contained in §

6A-3-417

.

Provided that a banking institution properly employed the identification procedures prescribed in regulations adopted pursuant to this subsection at the time an AFDC or GPA check was cashed by such institution, the state shall honor and make payment on the AFDC or GPA check, and the banking institution shall not be liable to reimburse the state for a loss incurred as a result of the wrongful payment of a check by the banking institution. The director of the department of human services shall adopt regulations specifying: (1) The forms of reasonable identification that a banking institution shall accept when cashing an AFDC or GPA check pursuant to subsection (b); and (2) The identification procedures the institution must employ to receive payment thereon and to avoid liability for the wrongful payment of any such check. The regulations shall provide that the forms of reasonable identification shall include, but need not be limited to: (i) An AFDC or GPA photo-identification card issued by the department of human services; (ii) A valid identification card issued by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles pursuant to §

3-8-6

; (iii) A valid driver’s license; (iv) An identification card issued by the office of healthy aging; and (v) A valid identification card issued by the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service.

The department of human services shall issue a stop-payment order with respect to any AFDC or GPA check reported as lost, stolen, or undelivered. The department of human services shall not issue a replacement AFDC or GPA check for a period of three (3) business days from the date of the report of such loss, theft, or nondelivery.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 63, § 1.

40-6-5.3.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 22, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 12, P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 12, P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 12, and P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 12, effective on the later of May 1, 1997 or the first day of the second month following the month of receipt by the Rhode Island Department of Human Services of all federal approvals and/or federal waivers from the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services necessary to implement the provisions of the acts, provided, however, that the Rhode Island Department of Human Services is authorized and directed to seek such federal approvals and/or federal waivers upon passage of the acts.

40-6-6.
Authorization to pay assistance.

Authorization to pay all forms of assistance specified in this chapter shall be made by representatives of the department, and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for payments upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 46, § 1.

40-6-7.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 14, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 26, § 2, effective July 1, 1990.

40-6-7.1.
Expanded eligibility for pregnant women and young children.

With respect to pregnant women and with respect to children under the age of five (5), the state hereby adopts the optional expanded income and resource eligibility standards set forth in amendments to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq. Pregnant women and children up to the age of five (5), in accordance with federal regulation, whose income is greater than the AFDC standard but less than the federal poverty level, are hereby declared to be eligible for medical assistance under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 463, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 11; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 11; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 11; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 11.

40-6-7.2.
Presumptive eligibility for pregnant women.

With respect to pregnant women, the state hereby adopts the optional presumptive-eligibility program set forth in amendments to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq. The department of human services is hereby directed to prepare the necessary forms and give the necessary training to providers of prenatal care to enable the providers to participate in the presumptive-eligibility program pursuant to the above-referenced federal laws. The director of the department of human services is authorized to promulgate such regulations as may be necessary to implement the presumptive-eligibility program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 463, § 1.

40-6-8.
Supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP).

The department shall have the responsibility to administer the food stamp program for the state in compliance with the provisions of the federal Food Stamp Act of 1964, as amended, 7 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq. The supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP) is and shall be the new title of the program formerly known as the food stamp program. All references in the Rhode Island general laws to food stamps shall be deemed to mean, apply to, refer to, and be interpreted in accordance with the supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP).

The department is empowered and authorized to submit its plan for food stamps to the federal government, or any agency or department of it, as follows:

The department shall act for the state in any negotiations relative to the submission and approval of a plan, and may make any arrangement or changes in its plan not inconsistent with this chapter that may be required by the Food Stamp Act or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to it to obtain and retain such approval and to secure for this state the benefits of the provisions of the federal act relating to food stamps;

The department shall make reports to the federal government, or any agency or department of it, in the form and nature required by it, and in all respects comply with any request or direction of the federal government, or any agency or department of it, that may be necessary to assure the correctness and verification of the reports; and

The department shall develop a plan to streamline the application, certification, and recertification process for SNAP beneficiaries aged sixty (60) years and over.

The department is authorized and directed to pay one hundred percent (100%) of the state’s share of the administrative cost involved in the operation of the food stamp program.

No person shall be ineligible for food stamp benefits due solely to the restricted eligibility rules otherwise imposed by § 115(a)(2) of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-193), 21 U.S.C. § 862a(a)(2), and as this section may hereafter be amended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 34, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 25, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 181, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 163, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 164, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

40-6-8.1.
Prohibited uses of electronic benefit transfer cards.

The department shall adopt rules prohibiting purchases with cash assistance funds held on electronic benefit transfer cards in venues as described in this section.

The department is hereby empowered, and shall maintain policies and practices as necessary, to prohibit cash assistance provided under this chapter from being used in any electronic benefit transfer transaction at:

Liquor stores (holding solely a retailers class A license);

Casinos or at facilities that conduct casino gaming as defined in chapter 61.2 of title 42;

Gambling facilities as defined by chapter 9 of title 41;

Retail establishments that provide adult-oriented entertainment in which performers disrobe or perform in an unclothed state for entertainment as defined in the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 608(a).

Eligible recipients of direct-cash assistance, who use cash assistance funds held on electronic benefit transfer cards in such establishments, shall, for a first offense, have their cash assistance reduced for one month by the portion of the family’s benefit attributable to one parent, in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the department; for a second offense, have their cash assistance reduced for three (3) months by the portion of the family’s benefit attributable to one parent, in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the department; and for a third offense, shall be disqualified from the direct-cash assistance program for a period of one year.

A store owner who commits fraud against the department of human services by violating §

11-41-34

, and who also possesses a license to sell alcoholic beverages under chapter 7 of title 3, shall be referred to the appropriate licensing authority for possible disciplinary action pursuant to title 3.

A store owner who commits fraud against the department of human services by violating §

11-41-34

, and who also possesses a license to sell lottery tickets under chapter 61 of title 42, shall be referred to the director of the state lottery for possible disciplinary action.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 377, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 499, § 1.

40-6-8.2.
Establishment of retail SNAP incentives pilot program.

There shall be established a retail supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP) incentives pilot program to be administered by the department of human services. Funds appropriated for the program shall be expended first for the implementation and administration of the retail SNAP incentives program to promote healthy food access and nutrition among Rhode Island SNAP recipients.

SNAP households will receive fifty cents ($0.50) credit on their electronic benefit transfer (EBT) card for each one dollar ($1.00) spent on eligible fruits and vegetables at participating retailers, up to a monthly limit as determined by the department.

This pilot program shall take effect on January 1, 2023, and operate until appropriated funds are expended.

The department of human services shall promulgate rules, regulations, and procedures necessary for the implementation of this section including, but not limited to the following:

Eligibility for pilot participation;

Purchases eligible to earn incentive payments;

Monthly incentive limits that may be earned by participating households; and

Eligible uses of earned incentive payments.

The department shall report to the speaker of the house, president of the senate, and chairpersons of the house and senate finance committees regarding the amount of credits issued pursuant to this section and administrative expenses, no later than February 15, 2024.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.